Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
166E

NON-AGRICULTURAL
PARK LANDS

Section

166E-1 Legislative findings

166E-2 Definitions

166E-3 Transfer and management of non-agricultural
park lands

and related
facilities to the department of agriculture

166E-4 Conversion of
qualified and encumbered other agricultural

lands

166E-5 Extension of qualified and encumbered
non-agricultural

park lands transferred to and managed by
the

department

166E-6 Rules

166E-7 Non-agricultural park lands special fund;
established

166E-8 Disposition

166E-9 Authority to plan, develop, and manage
non-agricultural

park lands

166E-10 Non-agricultural park land development

166E-11 Lease negotiation

166E-12 Policy

166E-13 Rights of holders of security interests

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next